zh-TW: 授權/使用條款: 允許商業用途; 有限商業用途 (販售成品); 其他/見說明; 個人與禮品用途; 僅限個人使用; 允許教學/課堂使用; 其他
ro-RO: Termeni de licență/utilizare: Utilizare comercială permisă; Comercială limitată (vânzarea de articole finite); Altele/vezi descrierea; Utilizare personală + cadou; Doar pentru utilizare personală; Utilizare în predare/curs permisă; Altele
fi: Lisenssi-/käyttöehdot: Kaupallinen käyttö sallittu; Rajoitettu kaupallinen (valmiiden tuotteiden myynti); Muu / katso kuvaus; Henkilökohtainen ja lahjakäyttö; Vain yksityiskäyttöön; Opetus-/luokkakäyttö sallittu; Muu
en: License/usage terms: Commercial use allowed; Limited commercial (sell finished items); Other/see description; Personal + gift use; Personal use only; Teaching/class use allowed; Other
zh-CN: 许可/使用条款: 允许商业用途; 有限的商业用途（销售成品）; 其他/参阅说明; 个人用途与礼品用途; 仅限个人使用; 允许教学/课堂使用; 其他
de: Lizenz-/Nutzungsbedingungen: Kommerzielle Nutzung erlaubt; Eingeschränkt kommerziell (Verkauf fertiger Artikel); Sonstige/siehe Beschreibung; Persönliche Nutzung + Geschenke; Nur für den privaten Gebrauch; Nutzung für Unterricht/Kurse erlaubt; Sonstige
lt-LT: Licencijos / naudojimo sąlygos: Leidžiamas komercinis naudojimas; Ribotas komercinis (pagamintų prekių pardavimas); Kita / žr. aprašymą; Asmeninis naudojimas ir dovanoms; Tik asmeniniam naudojimui; Leidžiama naudoti mokymui / pamokose; Kita
pt-BR: Licença/uso termos: Uso comercial permitido; Comercial limitado (vender itens prontos); Outro/ver descrição; Uso pessoal e presente; Apenas para uso pessoal; Uso permitido para ensino/aulas; Outro
da: Licens-/brugsbetingelser: Kommerciel brug tilladt; Begrænset kommerciel (sælg færdige varer); Andet/se beskrivelse; Personlig brug og gave; Kun til personlig brug; Tilladt til undervisning/brug i klassen; Andet
pl: Warunki licencji/użytkowania: Dozwolony użytek komercyjny; Ograniczony użytek komercyjny (sprzedaż gotowych produktów); Inne / patrz opis; Do użytku osobistego i na prezent; Tylko do użytku osobistego; Dozwolony użytek dydaktyczny / w klasie; Inne
tr: Lisans/kullanım koşulları: Ticari kullanıma izin verilir; Sınırlı ticari (bitmiş ürünlerin satışı); Diğer/açıklamaya bakın; Kişisel kullanım + hediye kullanımı; Yalnızca kişisel kullanım; Öğretim/sınıf kullanımına izin verilir; Diğer
vi: Điều khoản cấp phép/sử dụng: Được phép sử dụng cho mục đích thương mại; Thương mại giới hạn (bán mặt hàng thành phẩm); Khác/xem mô tả; Sử dụng cá nhân + quà tặng; Chỉ sử dụng cá nhân; Cho phép dùng trong giảng dạy/lớp học; Khác
hu: Licenc-/használati feltételek: Kereskedelmi célú felhasználás engedélyezett; Korlátozott kereskedelmi (késztermékek értékesítése); Egyéb/lásd a leírást; Személyes és ajándékozási célú; Kizárólag személyes használatra; Oktatási/tantermi használat engedélyezett; Egyéb
ru: Условия лицензии и использования: Разрешено коммерческое использование; Ограниченное коммерческое (продажа готовых изделий); Другое/см. описание; Для личного использования и подарков; Только для личного использования; Разрешено для обучения/занятий; Другое
it: Termini di licenza/utilizzo: Uso commerciale consentito; Commerciale limitato (vendita di articoli finiti); Altro/vedi descrizione; Uso personale e regalo; Solo per uso personale; Uso consentito per insegnamento/corsi; Altro
es: Términos de licencia/uso: Uso comercial permitido; Comercial limitado (venta de artículos terminados); Otro/ver descripción; Uso personal + regalo; Solo para uso personal; Uso permitido en enseñanza/clases; Otro
cs: Licenční/používací podmínky: Komerční použití povoleno; Omezené komerční použití (prodej hotových předmětů); Jiné / viz popis; Osobní použití a jako dárek; Pouze pro osobní použití; Povoleno pro výuku / použití ve třídě; Jiné
sl-SI: Licenčni pogoji/pogoji uporabe: Dovoljena komercialna uporaba; Omejena komercialna (prodaja končnih izdelkov); Drugo/glej opis; Osebna uporaba in darilo; Samo za osebno uporabo; Dovoljena uporaba za poučevanje/v razredu; Drugo
pt-PT: Termos de licença/utilização: Uso comercial permitido; Comercial limitado (venda de artigos acabados); Outro/ver descrição; Uso pessoal e oferta; Apenas para uso pessoal; Permitido para ensino/aulas; Outro
nl: Licentie-/gebruiksvoorwaarden: Commercieel gebruik toegestaan; Beperkt commercieel (verkoop van afgewerkte artikelen); Overig/zie beschrijving; Persoonlijk gebruik en cadeaus; Alleen voor persoonlijk gebruik; Onderwijs-/klassikaal gebruik toegestaan; Overig
ja: ライセンス／使用条件: 商用利用可能; 制限付き商用利用 (完成品の販売); その他/説明を参照; 個人利用+ギフト利用; 個人利用のみ; 教育/授業での利用可; その他
nb: Lisens- og bruksvilkår: Kommersiell bruk tillatt; Begrenset kommersiell bruk (selg ferdige varer); Annet / se beskrivelse; Personlig bruk + gaver; Kun for personlig bruk; Tillatt for undervisning / bruk i klasserom; Annet
sk-SK: Licenčné podmienky/podmienky používania: Komerčné použitie povolené; Obmedzené komerčné použitie (predaj hotových položiek); Iné/pozrite si popis; Osobné použitie a darčeky; Len na osobné použitie; Výučba/použitie na hodinách povolené; Iné
el: Όροι άδειας χρήσης/χρήσης: Επιτρέπεται η εμπορική χρήση; Περιορισμένη εμπορική (πώληση τελικών προϊόντων); Άλλο/δείτε την περιγραφή; Προσωπική χρήση + για δώρο; Μόνο για προσωπική χρήση; Επιτρέπεται η χρήση για διδασκαλία/σε τάξη; Άλλο
fr: Conditions de licence ou d’utilisation: Utilisation commerciale autorisée; Utilisation commerciale limitée (vente d’articles finis); Autre/voir la description; Usage personnel et cadeau; Usage personnel uniquement; Enseignement/usage en classe autorisé; Autre
ko: 라이선스/사용 약관: 상업적 사용 가능; 제한적 상업용(완제품 판매); 기타/설명 참조; 개인용 + 선물용; 개인 용도 전용; 강의/수업용 사용 허용; 기타
sv: Licens-/användningsvillkor: Tillåtet för kommersiellt bruk; Begränsat kommersiellt (sälja färdiga produkter); Övrigt/se beskrivning; Personligt bruk + gåva; Endast för personligt bruk; Tillåtet för undervisning/klassbruk; Övrigt
hr-HR: Uvjeti licence/korištenja: Dopuštena komercijalna upotreba; Ograničena komercijalna (prodaja gotovih predmeta); Ostalo / pogledajte opis; Osobna upotreba i pokloni; Samo za osobnu upotrebu; Dopuštena upotreba u nastavi/školi; Ostalo
bg-BG: Условия за лиценз/ползване: Разрешена комерсиална употреба; Ограничена комерсиална (продажба на готови продукти); Други/вижте описанието; За лична употреба и подарък; Само за лична употреба; Разрешено за преподаване/класни стаи; Други
th: เงื่อนไขการอนุญาต/การใช้งาน: อนุญาตให้ใช้เชิงพาณิชย์; เชิงพาณิชย์แบบจำกัด (ขายสินค้าสำเร็จรูป); อื่นๆ/ดูคำอธิบาย; สำหรับใช้ส่วนตัว + มอบเป็นของขวัญ; สำหรับการใช้งานส่วนบุคคลเท่านั้น; อนุญาตให้ใช้ในการสอน/ในชั้นเรียน; อื่นๆ